Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF222.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 6 TLSB 1442SV (2) 91 je/js S.F. 222 DIVISION I 1 FUNCTIONS OF DEPARTMENT OF WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT, WORKFORCE 2 DEVELOPMENT BOARD, AND LOCAL WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT BOARDS 3 Section 1. Section 15H.9, subsection 2, Code 2025, is 4 amended to read as follows: 5 2. The commission may adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A 6 for approving Iowa national service corps programs and national 7 service positions. Existing programs and service positions, 8 including those established through the AmeriCorps programs in 9 Iowa created pursuant to 42 U.S.C. Â§12501, Senior Corps and 10 AmeriCorps vista in Iowa created pursuant to 42 U.S.C. Â§4950 et 11 seq., the Iowa summer youth corps program created pursuant to 12 section 15H.5 , the Iowa green corps program created pursuant to 13 section 15H.6 , the Iowa reading corps program created pursuant 14 to section 15H.7 , and the RefugeeRISE AmeriCorps program 15 created pursuant to section 15H.8 , and the Iowa conservation 16 corps created pursuant to section 84A.7 , are part of the Iowa 17 national service corps programs and national service positions. 18 Sec. 2. Section 84A.1, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 19 to read as follows: 20 1. The department of workforce development is created to 21 administer the laws of this state relating to unemployment 22 compensation insurance , and job placement and training , 23 employment safety, labor standards, and workersâ compensation . 24 Sec. 3. Section 84A.1A, subsection 6, Code 2025, is amended 25 by striking the subsection and inserting in lieu thereof the 26 following: 27 6. The workforce development board may establish standing 28 committees of the board in the bylaws of the board. 29 Sec. 4. Section 84A.1A, subsection 7, paragraph a, Code 30 2025, is amended by striking the paragraph and inserting in 31 lieu thereof the following: 32 a. All documents required by current federal workforce rules 33 and regulations. 34 Sec. 5. Section 84A.1B, unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2025, 35 -1- LSB 1442SV (2) 91 je/js 1/ 10 S.F. 222 is amended to read as follows: 1 The In addition to the duties outlined in current federal 2 workforce rules and regulations, the workforce development 3 board shall do all of the following: 4 Sec. 6. Section 84A.1B, subsections 1, 2, 3, 5, 6, 7, 8, 5 9, 10, 11, 12, and 15, Code 2025, are amended by striking the 6 subsections. 7 Sec. 7. Section 84A.1B, subsection 13, Code 2025, is amended 8 by striking the subsection and inserting in lieu thereof the 9 following: 10 13. Assist the governor in the designation of local 11 workforce development areas or regions as outlined in current 12 federal workforce rules and regulations. 13 Sec. 8. Section 84A.3, Code 2025, is amended by striking the 14 section and inserting in lieu thereof the following: 15 84A.3 Local workforce development plans. 16 1. A local workforce development board shall, in 17 partnership with the chief elected official, develop a local 18 workforce development plan in accordance with current federal 19 workforce laws, rules, and regulations. The local workforce 20 development board shall submit the workforce development plan 21 to the department of workforce development for review and 22 approval in the manner and form determined by the department. 23 2. All local workforce plan modifications shall be 24 submitted to the department of workforce development for 25 review and approval in the manner and form determined by the 26 department. Modifications to the local workforce development 27 plan must be developed in accordance with current federal 28 workforce laws, rules, and regulations. 29 3. The local workforce development plan and modifications 30 shall include the contents required by current federal 31 workforce laws, rules, and regulations, and such other 32 information as the department of workforce development or the 33 state workforce development board may require. 34 Sec. 9. Section 84A.5, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 2025, 35 -2- LSB 1442SV (2) 91 je/js 2/ 10 S.F. 222 is amended to read as follows: 1 a. The workforce development system shall strive to 2 provide high quality services to its customers including 3 workers, families, and businesses. The department of workforce 4 development shall maintain a common intake, assessment, and 5 customer tracking system and to the extent practical provide 6 one-stop services to customers at workforce development centers 7 and other service access points. The department of workforce 8 development shall administer a statewide standard skills 9 assessment to assess the employability skills of adult workers 10 statewide and shall instruct appropriate department staff in 11 the administration of the assessment. The assessment shall 12 be included in the one-stop services provided to customers at 13 workforce development centers and other service access points 14 throughout the state. 15 Sec. 10. Section 84A.5, subsection 5, paragraphs a, b, and 16 c, Code 2025, are amended by striking the paragraphs. 17 Sec. 11. Section 84A.5, subsection 7, Code 2025, is amended 18 by striking the subsection. 19 Sec. 12. Section 84A.5, subsection 10, Code 2025, is amended 20 to read as follows: 21 10. The department of education, in collaboration with the 22 department of workforce development , is responsible for the 23 development and oversight of industry and sector partnerships 24 in the state. 25 Sec. 13. Section 84A.6, subsection 4, Code 2025, is amended 26 by striking the subsection. 27 Sec. 14. Section 97B.1A, subsection 8, paragraph b, 28 subparagraph (8), Code 2025, is amended by striking the 29 subparagraph. 30 Sec. 15. Section 256.228, subsection 4, paragraph d, Code 31 2025, is amended by striking the paragraph and inserting in 32 lieu thereof the following: 33 d. In collaboration with the department of workforce 34 development and the department of education, compile an annual 35 -3- LSB 1442SV (2) 91 je/js 3/ 10 S.F. 222 report, in an aggregate form to protect the confidentiality 1 of each eligible programâs participants, that includes the 2 number of students receiving scholarships under this section, 3 the number of students receiving grants under section 256.229, 4 the number of scholarship and grant recipients completing 5 a program of study or major annually and in the prescribed 6 time frame under this section or section 256.229, the number 7 of eligible institutions participating in the scholarship 8 and grant programs established under this section or section 9 256.229, the number of written agreements entered into by the 10 volunteer mentor program under section 15H.10, statistics on 11 employment outcomes for future ready Iowa skilled workforce 12 last-dollar scholarship and future ready Iowa skilled workforce 13 grant program participants by industry, and other data as 14 may be deemed pertinent by the commission, the department of 15 workforce development, or the department of education. The 16 commission shall submit the report to the governor and the 17 general assembly annually by January 15. 18 Sec. 16. Section 256.229, subsection 4, paragraph d, Code 19 2025, is amended to read as follows: 20 d. Transmit to the department of workforce development Use 21 the compilation of information, data, and statistics submitted 22 in accordance with subsection 1 , paragraph âcâ , subparagraph 23 (6), for to compile the annual report required under section 24 84A.1B 256.228, subsection 4, paragraph âdâ . 25 Sec. 17. REPEAL. Sections 84A.7, 84A.8, 84A.9, 84A.10, and 26 84A.11, Code 2025, are repealed. 27 DIVISION II 28 UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE ââ TAXABLE WAGES 29 Sec. 18. Section 96.1A, subsection 36, unnumbered paragraph 30 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 31 âTaxable wagesâ means an amount of wages upon which an 32 employer is required to contribute based upon wages which 33 that have been paid in this state during a calendar year to 34 an individual by an employer or the employerâs predecessor , 35 -4- LSB 1442SV (2) 91 je/js 4/ 10 S.F. 222 in this state or another state which extends a like comity to 1 this state, with respect to employment, upon which the employer 2 is required to contribute, which equals the greater of the 3 following: 4 DIVISION III 5 IOWA STUDENT INTERNSHIP PROGRAM 6 Sec. 19. Section 84A.21, Code 2025, is amended to read as 7 follows: 8 84A.21 Iowa student internship program. 9 1. As used in this section , unless the context otherwise 10 requires: 11 a. âInnovative businessâ means the same as defined in 12 section 15E.52 âDepartmentâ means the department of workforce 13 development . 14 b. âInternshipâ means temporary employment of a student that 15 focuses on providing the student with work experience in the 16 studentâs field of study. 17 c. âIowa studentâ means a student of an Iowa community 18 college, private college, or institution of higher learning 19 under the control of the state board of regents, or a student 20 who graduated from high school in Iowa but now attends an 21 institution of higher learning outside the state of Iowa. 22 2. a. The department of workforce development shall 23 establish and administer an internship program with two 24 components for Iowa students. To the extent permitted by 25 this section , the department of workforce development shall 26 administer the two components in as similar a manner as 27 possible. 28 b. The purpose of the first component of the program is 29 to link Iowa students to small and medium-sized Iowa firms 30 through internship opportunities. An Iowa employer may receive 31 financial assistance on a matching basis for a portion of the 32 wages paid to an intern. If providing financial assistance, 33 the department of workforce development shall provide the 34 assistance on a reimbursement basis such that for every two 35 -5- LSB 1442SV (2) 91 je/js 5/ 10 S.F. 222 dollars of wages earned by the student, one dollar paid by 1 the employer is matched by one dollar from the department of 2 workforce development. The amount of financial assistance 3 shall not exceed three thousand one hundred dollars for any 4 single internship, or nine thousand three hundred dollars 5 for any single employer. In order to be eligible to receive 6 financial assistance, the employer must have five hundred 7 or fewer employees and must be an innovative business. The 8 department of workforce development shall encourage youth who 9 reside in economically distressed areas, youth adjudicated to 10 have committed a delinquent act, and youth transitioning out 11 of foster care to participate in the first component of the 12 internship program. 13 c. (1) The purpose of the second component of the program 14 is to assist in placing Iowa students studying in the fields 15 of science, technology, engineering, and mathematics into 16 internships that lead to permanent positions with Iowa 17 employers. The department of workforce development shall 18 collaborate with eligible employers, including but not limited 19 to innovative businesses, to ensure that the interns hired 20 are studying in such fields. An Iowa employer may receive 21 financial assistance on a matching basis for a portion of the 22 wages paid to an intern. If providing financial assistance, 23 the department of workforce development shall provide the 24 assistance on a reimbursement basis such that for every two 25 dollars of wages earned by the student, one dollar paid by 26 the employer is matched by one dollar from the department of 27 workforce development . The amount of financial assistance 28 shall not exceed five thousand dollars per internship. 29 The department of workforce development may adopt rules 30 to administer this component section . In adopting rules 31 to administer this component, the department of workforce 32 development shall adopt rules as similar as possible to those 33 adopted pursuant to paragraph âbâ . 34 (2) The requirement to administer this component of the 35 -6- LSB 1442SV (2) 91 je/js 6/ 10 S.F. 222 internship program is contingent upon the provision of funding 1 for such purposes by the general assembly. 2 3. a. An Iowa student internship fund is created in the 3 state treasury under the control of the department of workforce 4 development . The fund shall consist of moneys appropriated to 5 the department of workforce development and any other moneys 6 available to, obtained, or accepted by the department of 7 workforce development for placement in the fund. 8 b. Payments of interest, repayments of moneys loaned 9 pursuant to this section , and recaptures of financial 10 assistance shall be credited to the fund. Moneys in the fund 11 are not subject to section 8.33 . Notwithstanding section 12 12C.7 , interest or earnings on moneys in the fund shall be 13 credited to the fund. 14 c. Moneys in the fund are appropriated to the department 15 of workforce development and, with the approval of the Iowa 16 workforce development board, shall be used to increase the 17 availability of skilled workers in innovative businesses, by 18 providing Iowa student internship opportunities. Such moneys 19 shall not be used for the support of retail businesses, health 20 care businesses, or other businesses requiring a professional 21 license. 22 Sec. 20. APPROPRIATION ââ IOWA STUDENT INTERNSHIP 23 FUND. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state 24 to the department of workforce development for the fiscal year 25 beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following 26 amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 27 purposes designated: 28 For deposit in the Iowa student internship fund created in 29 section 84A.21: 30 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,039,425 31 DIVISION IV 32 ADULT EDUCATION AND LITERACY PROGRAMS 33 Sec. 21. Section 84A.5, subsection 5, paragraph n, Code 34 2025, is amended to read as follows: 35 -7- LSB 1442SV (2) 91 je/js 7/ 10 S.F. 222 n. Adult education and literacy programs with community 1 colleges under section 84A.19 . 2 Sec. 22. Section 84A.19, Code 2025, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 84A.19 Adult education and literacy programs. 5 1. For purposes of this section , unless the context 6 otherwise requires : 7 a. âAdult education and literacy programsâ , âadult education 8 and literacy programsâ means adult basic education, adult 9 education leading to a high school equivalency diploma under 10 chapter 259A , English as a second language instruction, and 11 workplace and family literacy instruction. 12 b. âCommunity collegesâ means the same as defined in section 13 260C.2 . 14 2. The department of workforce development and community 15 colleges shall jointly implement adult education and literacy 16 programs to assist adults and youths sixteen years of age and 17 older who are not in school in obtaining the knowledge and 18 skills necessary for further education, work, and community 19 involvement. 20 3. The department of workforce development , in consultation 21 with community colleges, shall prescribe standards for adult 22 education and literacy programs including but not limited 23 to contextualized and integrated instruction, assessments, 24 instructor qualification and professional development, data 25 collection and reporting, and performance benchmarks. 26 4. The department of workforce development , in consultation 27 with community colleges, shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 28 17A to administer this section . 29